Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 29. Rights of aliens.

No distinction shall ever be made by law between resident aliens and citizens as to the possession, taxation, enjoyment and descent of property.

Cross references. —

As to alien suffrage, see art. 6, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to inheritance rights, see §

2-4-105

.

As to contracts for alien labor, see §§

27-4-113

to

27-4-115

.

Descent and distribution. —

Collateral heirs living in Ireland were entitled to inheritance under the provisions of a United States treaty with Great Britain. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Sale by alien heir. —

Where an alien heir inherited property and sold it before the institution of an action by the state claiming an escheat, the state's claim was barred. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State regulation of land ownership by alien corporation, 21 ALR4th 1329.

Alien's taking of employment other than type specified in labor certification as warranting deportation under immigration laws, 62 ALR Fed 402.

When is aiding of alien's illegal entry into United States “for gain,” so as to be ground for exclusion under § 212(a)(31) of Immigration and Nationality Act ( 8 USC § 1182(a)(31) [8 USC § 1324]) or for deportation under § 241(a)(13) of Immigration and Nationality Act (8 USC § 1251(a)(13) [8 USC § 1227]),
77 ALR Fed 83.

Who is “alien crewman” working in “capacity required for normal operation and service” of vessel, under 8 USC § 1101(a)(15)(D), entitled to work without special certification required in 8 USC § 1182(a)(5), 109 ALR Fed 816.

Validity, construction, and application of § 274(a)(1)(A)(iv) of Immigration and Nationality Act (8 USCS § 1324(a)(1)(A)(iv)), making it unlawful to induce or encourage alien to come to, enter, or reside in United States, 137 ALR Fed 227.

Validity, construction, and application of § 274(a)(1)(A)(iii) of Immigration and Nationality Act (8 USCS § 1324(a)(1)(A)(iii)), making it unlawful to harbor or conceal illegal alien, 137 ALR Fed 255.

§ 30. Monopolies and perpetuities prohibited.

Perpetuities and monopolies are contrary to the genius of a free state, and shall not be allowed. Corporations being creatures of the state, endowed for the public good with a portion of its sovereign powers, must be subject to its control.

Cross references. —

As to corporations, see art. 10, §§ 1 to 19, Wyo. Const., and title 17.

For rule against perpetuities, see §§

34-1-138

and

34-1-139

.

For provisions concerning monopolies and discrimination in trade generally, see §§

40-4-101

to

40-4-123

.

Section inapplicable to restraints on alienation. —

Since it is generally conceded by all of the eminent authors that the subject of restraints on alienation is separate and distinct from the rule against perpetuities, this section is without force in this field. McGinnis v. McGinnis, 391 P.2d 927,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1964).

Court without authority to carve out exception to rule against perpetuities. —

In view of the fact that the rule against perpetuities is embodied in a statute and in the constitution in Wyoming, a court is without authority to carve out an exception to the constitutional and statutory provision or to circumvent the constitution and statute through the inference of any fictitious device. Williams v. Watt, 668 P.2d 620,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1983).

Mineral interest following determinable fee valid when vested at time of its creation. —

It is reasonable and proper to identify an interest in a mineral estate following a determinable fee as a remainder which, when vested at the time of its creation, is valid under the rule against perpetuities. Williams v. Watt, 668 P.2d 620,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1983).

Rule against perpetuities not violated. —

Assignment in trust of all mineral royalties from certain lands to a trustee for the account of beneficiaries was a conveyance in fee simple to the trustee with an immediate vesting of the equitable interest in the beneficiaries, and therefore, the rule against perpetuities was not violated.
McGinnis v. McGinnis, 391 P.2d 927,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1964).

In a chapter
11 core proceeding, the bankruptcy court held that plaintiff’s
overriding royalty interests pursuant to the areas of mutual interest
clause within the parties’ fossil agreement was a purely
contractual
interest to which Wyoming’s Rule Against Perpetuities
did
not
apply because the agreement did not create any interest
in a
specific
parcel of land.
Gasconade Oil Co. v. Ultra Res., Inc. (In re Ultra Petroleum Corp.), 2018 Bankr. LEXIS 3574 (Bankr. S.D. Tex. Nov. 9, 2018).

Statute establishing qualification for newspapers entitled to publish legal notices. —

Former statute, providing that a newspaper having the right to publish notices with legal effect must have been established for one year or more, was not in conflict with the provisions of this section. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Contract relating to excess lands and their disposition. —

The provisions of a contract between a water conservancy district and the United States, relating to excess lands and their disposition, were not violative of this section. In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

Agreements between utilities to divide territory are invalid

on the ground of public policy, as utilities cannot between themselves contract away the jurisdiction of the public service commission. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

Applied

in

Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

, 26 A.L.R.2d 647 (1951).

Quoted

in

Mariano & Assocs. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 737 P.2d 323,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1987); Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforceability of sale-of-business agreement not to compete against nonsigner or nonowning signer, 60 ALR4th 294.

Anticompetitive covenants: aerial spray dust business, 60 ALR4th 965.

Standing of private party under § 16 of Clayton Act (15 USC § 26) to seek injunction to prevent merger or acquisition allegedly prohibited under § 7 of the act (15 USC § 18), 78 ALR Fed 159.

§ 31. Control of water.

Water being essential to industrial prosperity, of limited amount, and easy of diversion from its natural channels, its control must be in the state, which, in providing for its use, shall equally guard all the various interests involved.

Cross references. —

As to irrigation and water rights generally, see art. 8, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const., and title 41.

Powers of legislature. —

The legislature has power to authorize the supervision and control of the appropriation and distribution of public waters by administrative officers, pursuant to adjudicated priorities. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

Board of control authorized. —

Provision of statute providing for the powers and duties of board of control are not in conflict herewith. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

Seepage water. —

In accordance with the constitutional provisions and in line with previous holdings of the supreme court, seepage water arising on a farmer's land is subject to appropriation by him (subject to prescribed procedures) for lands other than those upon which the seepage arises. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Water within reservation. —

A district court may not assign the duties of administering state water within a reservation to a tribal water agency. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Abatement of dam constituting public nuisance. —

The state may sue in its own court for the abatement of a dam constituting a public nuisance, built in violation of the statutory requirement that all structures be approved by the state engineer. Big Horn Power Co. v. State, 23 Wyo. 271, 148 P. 1110,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1915).

Contract relating to excess lands and their disposition. —

The provisions of a contract between a water conservancy district and the United States, relating to excess lands and their disposition, were not violative of this section. In re Bridger Valley Water Conservancy Dist., 401 P.2d 289,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1965).

Applied

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961); In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1932); Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Constitutionality of the Wyoming Underground Water Statute,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 140.

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For case note, “Water Law — Statutory Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming. Wheatland Irr. Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 93 (1984).

For case note, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute. Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 19.

§ 32. Eminent domain.

Private property shall not be taken for private use unless by consent of the owner, except for private ways of necessity, and for reservoirs, drains, flumes or ditches on or across the lands of others for agricultural, mining, milling, domestic or sanitary purposes, nor in any case without due compensation.

Cross references. —

See also art. 10, § 9, Wyo. Const., and ch. 26 of title 1.

Intended purpose of this section is to facilitate development of this state's resources.

Coronado Oil Co. v. Grieves, 603 P.2d 406,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1979).

Public policy against landlocking property. —

The right to condemn a way of necessity under constitutional and statutory provisions is an expression of public policy against landlocking property and rendering it useless. Coronado Oil Co. v. Grieves, 603 P.2d 406,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1979).

Concept of common-law way of necessity is theoretically incompatible with this section.

Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Section 33 of this article supplements this section.

Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Eminent domain defined. —

Eminent domain is the right and power of the state to appropriate private property to a particular user for the purpose of promoting the general welfare. Coronado Oil Co. v. Grieves, 603 P.2d 406,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1979).

State may monitor Indian reserved water rights. —

The provisions in a stream adjudication decree, authorizing the state engineer to monitor Indian reserved water rights, were proper, as they contemplated neither the application of state law nor the authority to deprive the Tribes of water without the assistance of the courts in a suit for the administration of the decree. The role of the state engineer was not to apply state law, but to enforce the reserved rights against state appropriators, as decreed under principles of federal law. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Notice. —

Statutes authorizing the taking of property under the power of eminent domain must provide for legal notice, and where none is provided, it should not be implied by the court. Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1905).

Indirect benefit to people of Wyoming insufficient to justify condemnation. —

That condemnation of land in Wyoming for irrigation headgate and ditch to be used in reclamation of land immediately across the border in Colorado would indirectly benefit neighboring property in Wyoming and inhabitants of neighboring Wyoming city is insufficient to justify conclusion that proceeding was for benefit of people of
Wyoming. Grover Irrigation & Land Co. v. Lovella Ditch, Reservoir & Irrigation Co., 21 Wyo. 204, 131 P. 43,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1913).

But direct benefit will justify taking. —

That the people of another state will be benefited by a particular improvement or use for which private property is sought to be condemned will not prevent the taking if the use will also be a direct benefit to the people of the state.
Grover Irrigation & Land Co. v. Lovella Ditch, Reservoir & Irrigation Co., 21 Wyo. 204, 131 P. 43,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1913).

Taking fee in land for way of necessity. —

Statute permitting fee in land to be taken for way of necessity does not deny due process of law or take property without compensation. Meyer v. Colorado Cent. Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 355, 271 P. 212,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1928).

Right-of-way for flume to transport seepage water. —

Where waters seeped from a water association canal onto the land of a farmer, he was entitled to condemn a right-of-way over the canal for a flume to transport water to other lands owned by him for irrigation purposes, even though he had no right to compel continuance of the source of the water. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Condemnation by a non-public utility company. —

In a condemnation case under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 32 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-815

, by a power company, a certificate of convenience and necessity under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

37-2-205

and

1-26-816

was not required because the company was not a ‘public utility’ as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann § 37-1-101(a)(vi) in that the company supplied wholesale power to an energy corporation that in turn sold it to its members. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

When license to construct flume irrevocable. —

A license to construct a flume having been acted upon when grantee had a right to condemn a way was irrevocable. Gustin v. Harting, 20 Wyo. 1, 121 P. 522,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1912).

Special assessments for drainage districts

did not contravene this section. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Revolving local improvement fund. —

This section is not violated by ch. 155, Laws 1953, authorizing a municipality to set up a revolving local improvement fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes, from which fund the city may annually deposit in the local improvement district fund a sum sufficient to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Unemployment Compensation Act,

in taking money of employer and giving it to persons who have never been in his employ, serves a public purpose for welfare of all and does not violate this section. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act not applicable to inverse condemnation action. —

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act (WGCA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-39-101

to

1-39-121

, did not apply to inverse condemnation actions because there was nothing about the constitutional and statutory right to an inverse condemnation action, and nothing about the WGCA that reasonably suggested that the former should be subject to the latter, as the WGCA abrogated governmental immunity for certain listed torts, while inverse condemnation was not a tort and was a constitutional and statutory remedy that never was subject to governmental immunity. 2013 WY 3,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 2

.

Implied easements do not effect a taking. —

Parcel owners' claim that an implied easement for an apartment building effectuated a takings was properly rejected given case law holding that land subject to an easement passed with that easement and the enforcement or recognition of that easement did effect a taking. Miner v. Jesse & Grace, LLC, 2014 WY 17, 317 P.3d 1124,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Martens v. Johnson County Bd. of Comm'rs, 954 P.2d 375,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1998); Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978); Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988); Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001).

Stated

in

Hulse v. First Am. Title Co., 2001 WY 95, 33 P.3d 122,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Wymo Fuels, Inc. v. Edwards, 723 P.2d 1230,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 601

(Wyo. 1986); Price Family Trust v. Hutchinson, 2014 WY 162,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Dec. 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

For case note, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

For comment, “Death of the Dark Ages? The Troubled Law of Easements in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 151 (1992).

For case note, “Real Property — Wyoming's Private Road Statutes: Approaching a Dead End? Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1996)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Good will as element of damages for condemnation of property on which private business is conducted, 81 ALR3d 198.

Right of owner of land not originally taken or purchased as part of adjacent project to recover, on enlargement of project to include adjacent land, enhanced value of property by reason of proximity to original land, 95 ALR3d 752.

Eminent domain: possibility of overcoming specific obstacles to contemplated use as element in determining existence of necessary public use, 22 ALR4th 840.

Eminent domain: industrial park or similar development as public use justifying condemnation of private property, 62 ALR4th 1183.

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated — state takings, 49 ALR5th 769.

Application of

Kelo v. City of New London,

545 U.S. 469, 125 S. Ct. 2655, 162 L. Ed. 2d 439, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 5011 (2005), to “Public Use” Restrictions in Federal and State Constitutions Takings Clauses and Eminent Domain Statutes. 21 A.L.R.6th 261.